Utah statutes.
72-10-204.   Lands acquired by division and counties, municipalities, and
airport authorities -- Declaration of public purpose.
Any land acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied by the division or
by a county, municipality, or airport authority for the purposes enumerated in
Section 72-10-203, is acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied for
public, governmental, and municipal purposes.
